Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.97, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Summary page required. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning October 1, 2026, every state agency must include a concise summary page on the first page of any request for proposal (RFP) issued. The purpose of the summary page is for vendors to quickly assess the scope and requirements of an RFP. The summary page must be a standardized one-page overview containing key information from the RFP. The summary page must include the following: new text end new text begin (1) a plain language description of the project overview including a brief description of the goods or services needed; new text end new text begin (2) eligible applicants; new text end new text begin (3) budget range and total funding available; new text end new text begin (4) expected number of awards; new text end new text begin (5) anticipated award size; new text end new text begin (6) primary source of funds and any matching requirements; new text end new text begin (7) rate allowed for administrative costs and definition of administrative costs allowed; new text end new text begin (8) payment model and frequency; new text end new text begin (9) reporting requirements and frequency; new text end new text begin (10) pre-award requirements; new text end new text begin (11) estimate of application time; new text end new text begin (12) availability of application technical and accessibility tools; new text end new text begin (13) proposal deadline dates; new text end new text begin (14) agency contact information; and new text end new text begin (15) evaluation criteria. new text end new text begin (b) The summary page does not replace or supersede any specific requirements in the full RFP. The commissioner shall develop and make available to state agencies a standardized summary page template for use by all state agencies in the RFP process. State agencies must use the template without substantive alteration, except where it is necessary to accommodate agency-specific procurement issues. new text end